Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB244.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 6109(l)(2) of Title 18 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended to read:§ 6109. Licenses.* * *(l) Firearms License Validation System.--* * *(2) (i) Notwithstanding any other law regarding the confidentiality of information and subject to the provisions of subparagraph (ii), inquiries to the Firearms License Validation System regarding the validity of any Pennsylvania license to carry a firearm may only be made by law enforcement personnel acting within the scope of their official duties.123456789101112131415161718 (ii) Information from the Firearms License Validation System may not be provided to law enforcement personnel in a state that has not entered into a reciprocity agreement with the Commonwealth under subsection (k).* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0244PN0197 - 2 - 1234567